Connecticut, session 2026, SB00474.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Any person who, on or
2 after October 1, 2026, is appointed as a conservator of the estate or a
3 conservator of the person in a Probate Court proceeding conducted
4 pursuant to chapter 802h of the general statutes shall complete an
5 annual training program established by the Probate Court
6 Administrator pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
7 (b) The Probate Court Administrator shall, within available
8 appropriations, establish, supervise and fund a program of training for
9 newly appointed conservators of the estate and conservators of the
10 person. The training program shall include, but not be limited to, a
11 review of: (1) Statutory provisions, the Probate Court rules of procedure
12 and regulations adopted by the Probate Court Administrator that are
13 applicable to the responsibilities and duties of a conservator; (2) ethical
SB474 / File No. 577 1

SB474 File No. 577
14 considerations arising when carrying out the responsibilities and duties
15 of a conservator; (3) the operation of the Probate Court system; (4) the
16 Probate Court User Guide for Conservators; and (5) the resources that
17 are available to a conservator seeking assistance, guidance or advice in
18 carrying out the duties and responsibilities owed to the conserved
19 person.
20 (c) Any person appointed as a conservator of the estate or a
21 conservator of the person in a Probate Court proceeding, on or after
22 October 1, 2026, who without good cause shown, fails to complete the
23 annual training requirements prescribed in this section shall be subject
24 to removal as a conservator in accordance with the provisions of section
25 45a-660 of the general statutes.
26 (d) Any person appointed as a conservator of the estate or a
27 conservator of the person in a Probate Court proceeding, prior to
28 October 1, 2026, may participate in the annual training provided
29 pursuant to this section. The Probate Court Administrator may charge
30 a reasonable fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars for the provision of such
31 training to persons appointed as a conservator of the estate or a
32 conservator of the person prior to October 1, 2026.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
JUD Joint Favorable
SB474 / File No. 577 2

SB474 File No. 577
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Probate Court PCAF - Cost 476,930 476,930
Probate Court PCAF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: PCAF=Probate Court Administration Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Probate Court Administration (PCA) to establish
an annual training program for newly appointed conservators,1
resulting in a cost of $476,930 and a minimal potential revenue gain to
the Probate Court Administration Fund in FY 27 and FY 28.
To implement the training program, the PCA will need to hire two
trainers with total annual salary and fringe benefits costs of $170,000 and
$106,930, respectively. Annual costs for training materials, equipment,
and software licensing are not expected to exceed $200,000.2
The bill also allows current conservators3 to participate in the annual
training for a fee to the PCAF of up to $35. The revenue gain from this
provision is expected to be minimal because training is not required of
current conservators.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
1 In FY 25, there were approximately 4,141 new conservatorship cases.
2 The required annual training is estimated to take five to six hours.
3 There are approximately 17,700 individuals currently serving as conservators.
SB474 / File No. 577 3

SB474 File No. 577
continue into the future subject to annual wage increases, inflation, and
the number of training fees charged.
SB474 / File No. 577 4

SB474 File No. 577
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 474
AN ACT CONCERNING THE PROVISION OF ANNUAL TRAINING TO
A PERSON APPOINTED AS A CONSERVATOR IN A PROBATE
COURT PROCEEDING.